Maryland, session 2026, SB0019.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Health – General
SUBTITLE 59. MARYLAND COMMISSION ON WOMEN’S HEALTH ADVANCEMENT.
13–5901.
IN THIS SUBTITLE, “COMMISSION” MEANS THE MARYLAND COMMISSION ON
WOMEN’S HEALTH ADVANCEMENT.
13–5902.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0019*

SENATE BILL 19
(A) THERE IS A MARYLAND COMMISSION ON WOMEN’S HEALTH
ADVANCEMENT.
(B) THE PURPOSE OF THE COMMISSION IS TO STUDY THE FEASIBILITY OF
ESTABLISHING A STATE WOMEN’S HOSPITAL IN SOUTHERN MARYLAND AND A
STATEWIDE CLINICAL NETWORK TO ADVANCE WOMEN’S HEALTH BY ENSURING A
FULL CONTINUUM OF CARE ADDRESSING THE UNIQUE HEALTH CHALLENGES FACED
BY WOMEN ACROSS THEIR LIFESPANS.
(C) THE COMMISSION CONSISTS OF THE FOLLOWING MEMBERS:
(1) ONE MEMBER OF THE SENATE OF MARYLAND, APPOINTED BY THE
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE;
(2) ONE MEMBER OF THE HOUSE OF DELEGATES, APPOINTED BY THE
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE;
(3) THE ATTORNEY GENERAL, OR THE ATTORNEY GENERAL’S
DESIGNEE; AND
(4) THE FOLLOWING MEMBERS, APPOINTED BY THE GOVERNOR:
(I) ONE HEALTH CARE PROFESSIONAL WORKING IN EACH OF
THE FOLLOWING:
1. OBSTETRICS;
2. GYNECOLOGY;
3. UROGYNECOLOGY;
4. MATERNAL–FETAL HEALTH;
5. NURSE MIDWIFERY;
6. SOCIAL WORK; AND
7. A HOSPITAL SYSTEM;
(II) TWO HEALTH CARE EXPERTS FROM THE OFFICE OF THE
SECRETARY OF HEALTH, THE MARYLAND HEALTH CARE COMMISSION, OR THE
MARYLAND RURAL HEALTH ASSOCIATION;

SENATE BILL 19 3
(III) FIVE PATIENT ADVOCATES WHO FOCUS ON MATERNAL
HEALTH AND WOMEN’S WELL–BEING, INCLUDING AT LEAST ONE ADVOCATE WHO IS
A MINOR;
(IV) ONE INDIVIDUAL WITH EXPERTISE IN RACIAL, ETHNIC, AND
SOCIOECONOMIC HEALTH DISPARITIES FROM EACH OF THE FOLLOWING:
1. BALTIMORE CITY;
2. CENTRAL MARYLAND (ANNE ARUNDEL COUNTY,
BALTIMORE COUNTY, AND HOWARD COUNTY);
3. EASTERN MARYLAND (CAROLINE COUNTY,
DORCHESTER COUNTY, KENT COUNTY, QUEEN ANNE’S COUNTY, SOMERSET
COUNTY, TALBOT COUNTY, WICOMICO COUNTY, AND WORCESTER COUNTY);
4. NORTHERN MARYLAND (CARROLL COUNTY, CECIL
COUNTY, FREDERICK COUNTY, AND HARFORD COUNTY);
5. SOUTHERN MARYLAND (CALVERT COUNTY,
CHARLES COUNTY, PRINCE GEORGE’S COUNTY, AND ST. MARY’S COUNTY); AND
6. WESTERN MARYLAND (ALLEGANY COUNTY,
GARRETT COUNTY, AND WASHINGTON COUNTY);
(V) ONE REPRESENTATIVE FROM THE MARYLAND CHAPTER OF
THE NAACP WHO HAS EXPERTISE IN RACIAL, ETHNIC, AND SOCIOECONOMIC
HEALTH DISPARITIES;
(VI) ONE REPRESENTATIVE EACH FROM:
1. THE MORGAN STATE UNIVERSITY SCHOOL OF
COMMUNITY HEALTH AND POLICY; AND
2. THE UNIVERSITY OF MARYLAND SCHOOL OF PUBLIC
HEALTH;
(VII) TWO INSURANCE PROFESSIONALS WHO ARE ABLE TO
PROVIDE INSIGHT INTO EQUITABLE FINANCING AND SUSTAINABLE SPENDING FOR
HOSPITAL SERVICES;
(VIII) ONE INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY EXPERT; AND

SENATE BILL 19
(IX) ONE DATA ANALYST.
(D) TO THE EXTENT PRACTICABLE, THE MEMBERSHIP OF THE COMMISSION
SHALL REFLECT THE DIVERSITY OF THE STATE.
(E) THE GOVERNOR SHALL DESIGNATE A CHAIR FROM AMONG THE
MEMBERS OF THE COMMISSION.
(F) THE DEPARTMENT AND THE MARYLAND HEALTH CARE COMMISSION
JOINTLY SHALL PROVIDE STAFF FOR THE COMMISSION.
(G) A MEMBER OF THE COMMISSION:
(1) MAY NOT RECEIVE COMPENSATION AS A MEMBER OF THE
COMMISSION; BUT
(2) IS ENTITLED TO REIMBURSEMENT FOR EXPENSES UNDER THE
STANDARD STATE TRAVEL REGULATIONS, AS PROVIDED IN THE STATE BUDGET.
(H) THE TERM OF A MEMBER OF THE COMMISSION IS 7 YEARS.
13–5903.
THE COMMISSION SHALL:
(1) ANALYZE THE NEED FOR A CENTRALIZED HOSPITAL FOR WOMEN
WITH OUTPATIENT CLINIC LOCATIONS THROUGHOUT THE STATE;
(2) EXAMINE EXISTING HEALTH CARE GAPS, INCLUDING IN
UNDERSERVED POPULATIONS;
(3) IN COLLABORATION WITH THE MARYLAND HEALTH CARE
COMMISSION:
(I) ASSESS THE FINANCIAL VIABILITY FOR A STATE WOMEN’S
HOSPITAL AND ASSOCIATED OUTPATIENT CLINICS; AND
(II) INITIATE A CERTIFICATE OF NEED FOR A STATE WOMEN’S
HOSPITAL AND ASSOCIATED OUTPATIENT CLINICS;
(4) INVESTIGATE ALTERNATIVE APPROACHES TO A SINGLE–SITE
HOSPITAL, INCLUDING A HUB NETWORK THAT COORDINATES EXISTING SERVICES

SENATE BILL 19 5
ACROSS MULTIPLE LOCATIONS OR USES EXISTING INFRASTRUCTURE TO IMPROVE
WOMEN’S ACCESS TO HEALTH CARE; AND
(5) CONSULT WITH A BROAD RANGE OF STAKEHOLDERS, INCLUDING
HEALTH CARE PROVIDERS, PATIENT ADVOCATES, AND COMMUNITY
ORGANIZATIONS.
13–5904.
(A) ON OR BEFORE JANUARY 1, 2027, THE COMMISSION SHALL SUBMIT TO
THE GOVERNOR AND, IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 2–1257 OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT
ARTICLE, THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY AN INITIAL ACTION PLAN, INCLUDING A
TIMELINE, MILESTONES, AND SPECIFIC RESEARCH OBJECTIVES FOR THE WORK OF
THE COMMISSION.
(B) ON OR BEFORE JULY 1 EACH YEAR THROUGH 2032, THE COMMISSION
SHALL SUBMIT TO THE GOVERNOR AND, IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 2–1257 OF THE
STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE, THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY AN INTERIM REPORT
SUMMARIZING THE COMMISSION’S PROGRESS, FINDINGS, AND RECOMMENDATIONS.
(C) ON OR BEFORE DECEMBER 1, 2032, THE COMMISSION SHALL SUBMIT
TO THE GOVERNOR AND, IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 2–1257 OF THE STATE
GOVERNMENT ARTICLE, THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY A REPORT ON ITS FINDINGS AND
RECOMMENDATIONS ON THE NEED, FUNDING, LOCATION, IMPLEMENTATION PLAN,
AND STRUCTURE FOR THE STATE WOMEN’S HOSPITAL AND CLINICAL NETWORK.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026. It shall remain effective for a period of 7 years and, at the end of June 30, 2033,
this Act, with no further action required by the General Assembly, shall be abrogated and
of no further force and effect.